apertium-ru-uk.uk.dix
<!--imperf verbs-->
<pardef n="зна/ти__vblex_imperf_tv">
  <e>       <p><l>ти</l>        <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>й</l>         <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бач_imp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>тим</l>       <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/></r></p><par n="BASE__писатим\е_fut"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__розмовля\є_pres"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бу\в_cni_past"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ючи</l>       <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>н</l>         <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__англійський"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>вши</l>       <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>но</l>        <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impers"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="зна/ти__vblex_imperf_iv">
  <e>       <p><l>ти</l>        <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>й</l>         <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бач_imp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>тим</l>       <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/></r></p><par n="BASE__писатим\е_fut"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__розмовля\є_pres"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бу\в_cni_past"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ючи</l>       <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>н</l>         <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__англійський"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>вши</l>       <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>но</l>        <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impers"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="шука/ти__vblex_imperf_tv">
  <e>       <p><l>ти</l>        <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>й</l>         <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бач_imp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>тим</l>       <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/></r></p><par n="BASE__писатим\е_fut"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__розмовля\є_pres"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бу\в_cni_past"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ючи</l>       <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>н</l>         <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__англійський"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>вши</l>       <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>но</l>        <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impers"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="розмовля/ти__vblex_imperf_iv">
  <e>       <p><l>ти</l>        <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>й</l>         <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бач_imp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>тим</l>       <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/></r></p><par n="BASE__писатим\е_fut"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__розмовля\є_pres"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бу\в_cni_past"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ючи</l>       <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>вши</l>       <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="відповіда/ти__vblex_imperf_tv">
  <e>       <p><l>ти</l>        <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>й</l>         <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бач_imp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>тим</l>       <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/></r></p><par n="BASE__писатим\е_fut"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__розмовля\є_pres"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бу\в_cni_past"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ючи</l>       <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>вши</l>       <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="відповіда/ти__vblex_imperf_iv">
  <e>       <p><l>ти</l>        <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>й</l>         <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бач_imp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>тим</l>       <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/></r></p><par n="BASE__писатим\е_fut"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__розмовля\є_pres"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бу\в_cni_past"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ючи</l>       <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>вши</l>       <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="загляда/ти__vblex_imperf_tv">
  <e>       <p><l>ти</l>        <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>й</l>         <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бач_imp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>тим</l>       <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/></r></p><par n="BASE__писатим\е_fut"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__розмовля\є_pres"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бу\в_cni_past"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ючи</l>       <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>вши</l>       <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="загляда/ти__vblex_imperf_iv">
  <e>       <p><l>ти</l>        <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>й</l>         <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бач_imp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>тим</l>       <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/></r></p><par n="BASE__писатим\е_fut"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__розмовля\є_pres"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бу\в_cni_past"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ючи</l>       <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>вши</l>       <r>ти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="розмовляти">      <i>розмовля</i><par n="розмовля/ти__vblex_imperf_iv"/></e>
<e lm="знати">           <i>зна</i><par n="зна/ти__vblex_imperf_tv"/></e>
<e lm="знати">           <i>зна</i><par n="зна/ти__vblex_imperf_iv"/></e>
<e lm="шукати">          <i>шука</i><par n="шука/ти__vblex_imperf_tv"/></e>
<e lm="слухати">         <i>слуха</i><par n="зна/ти__vblex_imperf_tv"/></e>
<e lm="слухати">         <i>слуха</i><par n="зна/ти__vblex_imperf_iv"/></e>
<e lm="питати">          <i>пита</i><par n="розмовля/ти__vblex_imperf_iv"/></e>
<e lm="заглядати">       <i>загляда</i><par n="загляда/ти__vblex_imperf_tv"/></e>
<e lm="заглядати">       <i>загляда</i><par n="загляда/ти__vblex_imperf_iv"/></e>
<e lm="думати">          <i>дума</i><par n="розмовля/ти__vblex_imperf_iv"/></e>
<e lm="відповідати">     <i>відповіда</i><par n="відповіда/ти__vblex_imperf_tv"/></e>
<e lm="відповідати">     <i>відповіда</i><par n="відповіда/ти__vblex_imperf_iv"/></e>
